Alaska, session 34, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that the legislature 08 reevaluate the establishment of demonstration state-tribal education compacts, as provided 09 under this Act, in seven years. 10 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 11 read: 12 AUTHORIZATION OF DEMONSTRATION STATE-TRIBAL EDUCATION 13 COMPACTS. (a) The commissioner of education and early development is authorized to 14 enter into demonstration state-tribal education compacts with participating tribes. 01 (b) A demonstration state-tribal education compact must follow a template that 02 contains substantially similar or equivalent terms applicable to each participating tribe and 03 must include provisions regarding 04 (1) the five-year term of the compact; 05 (2) roles and responsibilities of the parties; 06 (3) legal, funding, and accounting compliance requirements; 07 (4) recordkeeping and auditing; 08 (5) notices of violation; 09 (6) compact termination; 10 (7) dispute resolution; 11 (8) express limited waiver of tribal sovereign immunity for the services 12 provided under the compact; 13 (9) limitation of liability; 14 (10) insurance; and 15 (11) mandatory participation in the teachers' retirement system (AS 14.25), the 16 public employees' retirement system (AS 39.35), or both. 17 (c) A demonstration state-tribal education compact authorized by this section must 18 take effect on or before June 30, 2028. 19 (d) In this section, "participating tribe" means the federally recognized tribes and 20 tribal organizations that participated in negotiations under sec. 1, ch. 43, SLA 2022. 21 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 22 read: 23 OPERATION OF DEMONSTRATION STATE-TRIBAL EDUCATION COMPACT 24 SCHOOLS. (a) A demonstration state-tribal education compact school must operate in 25 accordance with the terms of its compact executed under sec. 2 of this Act. 26 (b) A demonstration state-tribal education compact school is exempt from all state 27 statutes and regulations applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors, 28 except those statutes and regulations made applicable under this Act, in a demonstration state- 29 tribal education compact executed under sec. 2 of this Act, or in legislation enacted or 30 regulations adopted after the effective date of this Act. 31 (c) The following provisions apply to the operation and management of a 01 demonstration state-tribal education compact school as if the school were a school district: 02 (1) requirements relating to school district operations: 03 (A) AS 14.03.016 - 14.03.050 (regarding parental rights and 04 compulsory attendance, and defining the school term, day in session, and school 05 holidays); 06 (B) AS 14.03.072 (regarding literacy and early reading information); 07 (C) AS 14.03.083, 14.03.090 - 14.03.127, 14.03.135, and 14.03.140 08 (miscellaneous provisions applicable to school district operations); 09 (D) AS 14.09.010 - 14.09.030 (relating to transportation of students); 10 (E) AS 14.14.050 (imposing the requirement of an annual audit); 11 (F) AS 14.14.110 (authorizing cooperation with other school districts); 12 (G) AS 14.18 (prohibiting discrimination based on sex in public 13 education); 14 (H) AS 14.33.010 - 14.33.250 (relating to school safety and 15 discipline); 16 (I) regulations adopted by the state Board of Education and Early 17 Development to implement this paragraph that are applicable to school districts and 18 their schools; 19 (2) requirements relating to the public school funding program and the receipt 20 and expenditure of that funding: AS 14.17.500 - 14.17.910 (relating to student count 21 estimates, relating to school operating fund balances, and setting out the procedure for 22 payment of public school funding and imposing general requirements and limits on money 23 paid); 24 (3) requirements relating to teacher employment and retirement: 25 (A) AS 14.14.105 and 14.14.107 (relating to sick leave); 26 (B) AS 14.20.010 - 14.20.040 (relating to teacher certification), except 27 as provided in (d) of this section; 28 (C) AS 14.20.095 - 14.20.215 (relating to the employment and tenure 29 of teachers); 30 (D) AS 14.25 (provisions regarding the teachers' retirement system); 31 (E) AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 (authorizing collective bargaining by 01 certificated employees), except with regard to teachers who are administrators; 02 (4) requirements relating to students and educational programs: 03 (A) AS 14.30.180 - 14.30.350 (relating to educational services for 04 children with disabilities); 05 (B) AS 14.30.355 and 14.30.356 (relating to sexual abuse and sexual 06 assault awareness and prevention); 07 (C) AS 14.30.360 - 14.30.370 (establishing health education program 08 standards); 09 (D) AS 14.30.400 (relating to bilingual-bicultural education). 10 (d) Upon receipt of a request from a representative of a demonstration state-tribal 11 education compact school in which an applicant for a teacher certificate will be teaching, 12 (1) the state Board of Education and Early Development may waive the 13 requirements of AS 14.20.020(b) or 14.20.022(b) to allow an individual with specialized 14 knowledge relevant to the tribe to obtain a teacher certificate or subject-matter expert limited 15 teacher certificate; and 16 (2) the Department of Education and Early Development may issue a teacher 17 certificate to a person qualified under AS 14.20.023(b) or 14.20.025; a teacher certificate 18 issued under this paragraph does not require a request from the school board of the district or 19 regional educational attendance area in which a demonstration state-tribal education compact 20 school is located. 21 (e) A demonstration state-tribal education compact school may not 22 (1) engage in sectarian practices in the school's educational program, 23 admissions, employment policies, or operations; 24 (2) charge tuition; or 25 (3) restrict enrollment or school choice options available under state law. 26 (f) Unless a demonstration state-tribal education compact school is established as a 27 correspondence school, the physical location of the school must be within the boundary of a 28 school district that the state Board of Education and Early Development consulted with under 29 sec. 1(c), ch. 43, SLA 2022. 30 (g) For purposes of AS 14.25 and participation in the teachers' retirement system, 31 (1) a demonstration state-tribal education compact school is an "employer" as 01 defined in AS 14.25.220 and 14.25.590; and 02 (2) a certificated teacher employed by a demonstration state-tribal education 03 compact school is a member of the plan. 04 (h) Unless the context requires otherwise, the provisions of AS 14 made applicable to 05 a federally recognized tribe or tribal organization under this Act or a demonstration state- 06 tribal education compact school apply to 07 (1) the tribe or tribal organization as a "school district" as defined in 08 AS 14.30.350; 09 (2) a governing body established by the tribe or tribal organization to operate a 10 demonstration state-tribal education compact school as a "governing body" or "school board" 11 as defined in AS 14.60.010; and 12 (3) a demonstration state-tribal education compact school as a "public school" 13 or "public educational institution" as used in AS 14 and art. VII, sec. 1, Constitution of the 14 State of Alaska. 15 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 FACILITIES. A facility of a demonstration state-tribal education compact school must 18 conform to applicable law concerning public facility access, health, safety, and fire code 19 requirements. 20 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 FUNDING. (a) The legislature may appropriate funds in any manner permitted under 23 AS 14 to a demonstration state-tribal education compact school as if the school were a 24 regional educational attendance area. 25 (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Education and Early Development 26 may provide state aid and grant funding in any manner permitted under AS 14 to a 27 demonstration state-tribal education compact school as if the school were a regional 28 educational attendance area. 29 (c) For purposes of application for and receipt of federal aid to education, a 30 demonstration state-tribal education compact school constitutes a local educational agency. 31 (d) The Department of Education and Early Development may withhold funds from a 01 demonstration state-tribal education compact school for violation of 02 (1) state law made applicable by this Act; or 03 (2) a provision of the school's compact executed under sec. 2 of this Act. 04 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 REPORTING. (a) During the duration of a demonstration state-tribal education 07 compact, a participating federally recognized tribe or tribal organization shall report to the 08 commissioner of education and early development 09 (1) student data and enrollment using the same definitions and procedures 10 required under AS 14.17.600; and 11 (2) by November 15 of the year after the data is collected, school performance 12 data and the performance of the school's students under AS 14.03.120(d). 13 (b) The Department of Education and Early Development shall include data obtained 14 under (a) of this section in the department's report to the legislature under AS 14.03.078. 15 (c) On or before January 31, 2033, the Department of Education and Early 16 Development shall provide a written report to the legislature concerning demonstration state- 17 tribal education compacts. The department shall deliver the report to the senate secretary and 18 the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is 19 available. The report must include a summary of the data compiled for each demonstration 20 state-tribal education compact school from the reports made under (a) of this section from the 21 effective date of this Act through November 15, 2032. 22 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 23 read: 24 REGULATIONS. The Department of Education and Early Development and the state 25 Board of Education and Early Development may adopt regulations necessary to implement 26 the changes made by this Act. 27 * Sec. 8. Sections 2 - 7 of this Act are repealed July 1, 2036. 28 * Sec. 9. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.